Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-138
Claims; reconsideration.

The provisions of sections 23-135 to 23-137 shall not be so construed as to prevent the county board from once reconsidering their action on any claim, upon due notice to parties interested.

Laws 1879, § 40, p. 366;

R.S.1913, § 968;

C.S.1922, § 868;

C.S.1929, § 26-122;

R.S.1943, § 23-138.

A county board may reconsider once its action on the allowance of a claim, upon due notice to interested parties. State ex rel. Allen v. Miller, 138 Neb. 747, 295 N.W. 279 (1940).

Order of board establishing a ditch is not a judicial act and may be reconsidered where no rights have accrued thereunder. State ex rel. Sullivan v. Ross, 82 Neb. 414, 118 N.W. 85 (1908).

Order of disallowance, reconsidered, is not an adjudication of claim. Dean v. Saunders County, 55 Neb. 759, 76 N.W. 450 (1898).

Board may reconsider claim once on notice. Appearance of attorney is a waiver of notice. State ex rel. Marquett, Deweese & Hall v. Baushausen, 49 Neb. 558, 68 N.W. 950 (1896).

Board cannot review or reverse the act of a prior board. Stenberg v. State ex rel. Keller, 48 Neb. 299, 67 N.W. 190 (1896).